Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 64.90.685 and 2018 c 277 s 418 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((A))(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, a declarant, association, unit owner, or any other person subject to this chapter may bring an action to enforce a right granted or obligation imposed under this chapter or the governing documents. ((The))(b) Before bringing an action against an association, a unit owner shall notify the association of the alleged violation. If within 21 days after receiving notice the association fails to cure the violation or provide to the unit owner a substantive response in a tangible medium, the unit owner may bring an action without further notice.(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the court may award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.(b) In an action brought pursuant to this section by a unit owner against an association, the court shall award to a prevailing unit owner the unit owner's actual damages and reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.(((2)))(3) Parties to a dispute arising under this chapter or the governing documents may agree at any time to resolve the dispute by any form of binding or nonbinding alternative dispute resolution.--- END ---